Hawaii statutes.
§206-26 Disclosure by private developer;
public records. A private developer or assign, as the term is used in this
chapter, shall file with the board of land and natural resources an enumeration
list of all persons directly or indirectly connected with the private developer
or assign as a condition precedent to the private developer's or assign's
acceptance as the private developer or assign by the board. A private
developer or assign who fails to comply with this requirement shall
automatically forfeit all rights to any profit under this chapter.

All bids and any or all records of a private
developer or assign, relating to any and all transactions with the State, shall
be public records, as defined in chapter 92, and subject to such use as
permitted by chapter 92. [L 1961, c 6, §24; Supp, §98J-24; HRS §206-26; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next